src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s16_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - æra: # 
    flekja+V+Inf: flekja
    flekja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: flekir
    flekja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: flakti
    flekja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: flaktu
    flekja+V+Sup: flakt
    flekja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: flaktur
